Mississippi, session 2026, SB2431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-106-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-106-41.  (1)  If any member of the armed services, whose official house of record and residence is within the State of Mississippi, is officially reported as being either a prisoner of war or missing in action in Southeast Asia or has been a prisoner of a foreign government as the result of a military action against the United States naval vessel, Pueblo, his child or children shall be entitled to an eight-semester scholarship without cost, exclusive of books, food, school supplies, materials and dues or fees for extracurricular activities at any state-supported college or university of his choice within this state. However, no child will be entitled to receive benefits during any semester or quarter when said child has reached the age of twenty-three (23) years on the first day of the semester or quarter. (2)  The provisions of this section shall apply to the child or children of any member of the armed services who is officially reported as being either a prisoner of war or missing in action in Southeast Asia whose spouse was a resident of this state for a period of not less than ten (10) years during her minority and is a resident or physically resides within this state and does continually reside within this state at the time of enrollment and during the enrollment, and is a resident or physically resides within this state as of April 9, 1973. (3)  It is further provided that the provisions of this section shall apply to the child or children of any person who was a resident of this state at the time he was inducted into the Armed Forces of the United States of America and who is either a former prisoner of war or officially reported as being a prisoner of war or missing in action in Southeast Asia and who, or his spouse if she was a resident of this state for a period of not less than ten (10) years during her minority, is a resident of this state and at the time of enrollment and during the enrollment of his child or children at any state-supported college or university in this state resided or resides in this state. (4)  Any applicant qualified and desiring a scholarship under this section shall apply in writing to the board.  The board shall make inquiries into each such application and shall make the investigation as it deems proper to establish and validate all claims made under this section before a scholarship is granted. (5)  In addition to the scholarship prescribed in subsections (1) through (4), the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall establish a scholarship program, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, allowing veterans who have served in a combat zone or have a service-connected disability to receive scholarship tuition grants on a month-to-month basis at state-supported universities and community colleges. (a)  To qualify, veterans must: (i)  Be a Mississippi resident; (ii)  Have been honorably discharged; (iii)  Qualify for in-state tuition; (iv)  Not be eligible for federal educational benefits; and (v)  Have served on active duty during a wartime period and received a campaign medal for combat operations outside the U.S.; or (vi)  Have a service-connected disability rating of ten percent (10%) or more. (b)  Eligible veterans may receive a one-month scholarship grant for each month served during a qualifying period.  Veterans may receive a minimum of one (1) academic year and a maximum of four (4) academic years of scholarship grants. (c)  To apply, veterans may apply to their selected school's financial aid office or the Mississippi Army National Guard Education Service Office. (d)  Scholarships to veterans under this subsection (5) shall be subject to specific appropriation therefor by the Legislature.  There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Combat Veteran Scholarship Fund to be comprised of funds appropriated by the Legislature or provided from other sources for the purpose of making scholarship grants available to veterans under this subsection (5).  The appropriation to the Combat Veteran Scholarship Fund shall not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) in any fiscal year. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.